Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2518.01
Transfer of employees to county; state employee; rights.

(1) The board of county commissioners may, by resolution, request that a state or political subdivision transfer employees to the county (a) if the board of county commissioners finds that direct control over such employees will be of benefit to the county, (b) pursuant to a merger of services, or (c) due to the assumption of functions of the state or a political subdivision by the county. Such resolution shall state an effective date for the transfer of such employees. If the state or political subdivision determines that the transfer of its employees is necessary or desirable and approves the request of the board of county commissioners, the employees who are being transferred shall become county employees on the effective date of the transfer as stated in the resolution of the board of county commissioners requesting such transfer.

(2) No state employee subject to a transfer under subsection (1) of this section is required to become a county employee and may instead exercise all of his or her rights under any contract involving state employees and negotiated pursuant to the Industrial Relations Act and the State Employees Collective Bargaining Act.

Laws 2006, LB 808, § 9.

Industrial Relations Act, see section 48-801.01.

State Employees Collective Bargaining Act, see section 81-1369.